Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-2905
State Department of Education; employ coordinator; duties.

The State Department of Education shall employ a coordinator to administer the program. The duties of such coordinator shall include:

(1) Identifying and promoting the critical ways for local communities to participate in the program and advise communities on needed strategies, plans, and action to administer the program;

(2) Establishing a partnership with public agencies and nonprofit organizations to implement a public engagement campaign and establish a structure to facilitate communication between farmers and schools;

(3) Providing leadership at the state level to encourage schools to develop and improve school nutrition plans using locally or regionally grown or locally or regionally processed food;

(4) Conducting workshops and training sessions and providing technical assistance to school food services, farmers, processors, and distributors regarding the demand for and the availability of Nebraska food products, and assisting persons seeking to participate in the program;

(5) Providing information regarding the program in an electronic format on the websites for the State Department of Education and the Department of Agriculture; and

(6) Seeking financial or in-kind contributions to support the program.

Laws 2021, LB396, § 5.